Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 21.1 911 Emergency Telephone Number Act

39-21.1-1.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to establish the number 911 as the primary emergency telephone number for use in the state and to develop and improve emergency communications procedures and facilities with the objective of reducing the response time to emergency calls for law enforcement, fire, medical, rescue, and other emergency services.

It is hereby declared by the general assembly that:

Availability and type of 911 service in the state. The citizens of this state enjoy enhanced 911 service where a public safety answering point (PSAP) telecommunicator receives the 911 call, the pertinent information about the nature and location of the emergency by questioning the caller, and confirms the telephone number and address of the calling party. E-911 saves lives and property by helping emergency services personnel do their jobs more quickly and efficiently.

E-911 capabilities. E-911 information includes Automatic Location Identification (ALI), which permits the prompt dispatch of emergency assistance to the street address of the wireline phone. This capability is especially important where the caller is disoriented, disabled, unable to speak, or does not know his or her location. ALI also reduces the errors in reporting the location of the emergency and in forwarding accurate information to emergency personnel. Automatic Number Identification (ANI) allows the number of the calling party to be displayed at the PSAP. With ANI, the PSAP can call back the party if the call is disconnected. The general assembly finds that ALI and ANI are critical components of effective emergency services.

Wireless 911 capabilities. Mobility, the primary advantage of wireless technologies, creates complexities for providing E-911 service, necessitating special action for wireless E-911 services.

The need for wireless E-911 services. It has been reported that the total number of wireless subscribers in the United States exceeds 42 million, and 9.6 million new subscribers were added in 1995 alone. Currently, there are almost thirty thousand (30,000) new wireless subscribers each day, amounting to a forty percent (40%) annual growth rate. Industry studies report that a majority of new subscribers cite safety and security as a primary reason for purchasing a mobile phone. These statistics underscore the growing popularity of mobile communications. With this growth, wireless customers place a large and increasing portion of 911 emergency calls received by PSAPs. In 1994 alone, almost eighteen million (18,000,000) wireless calls were made nationwide to 911 and other public service numbers. It is in the health and safety interests of the citizens of this state that wireless 911 services be enhanced to provide critical ALI and ANI information.

The FCC mandate for wireless E-911. In July, 1996, the Federal Communications Commission (FCC) took several important steps to foster major improvements in the quality and reliability of wireless 911 services (FCC Docket No. 94-102). The FCC directed wireless carriers to deliver wireless E-911 information to PSAPs by April 1, 1998. The FCC also directed that wireless carriers, by October 1, 2001, identify to the PSAP the latitude and longitude of a mobile unit making an E-911 call within a radius of no more than one hundred twenty-five (125) meters in sixty-seven percent (67%) of all cases.

PSAP’S ability to receive wireless E-911 information. Currently, E-911 does not have the necessary systems, facilities, and trained personnel to receive ANI and ALI on wireless calls. It is in the health and safety interests of the citizens of this state that PSAPs have the capability to receive and process wireless E-911 calls, and to require standards of quality of service, performance of service, and technological compliance of all providers of telecommunication services.

Conditions for providing wireless E-911. The FCC mandate only applies if (a) PSAPs capable of receiving and utilizing the data elements associated with the E-911 services formally request such services from the wireless carriers in their jurisdiction and (b) a mechanism for the recovery of costs relating to the provision of such services is available. The FCC left it to each state to ensure that a mechanism is in place to permit carriers to recover costs associated with providing E-911 services. The general assembly finds that it is in the public interest to ensure that the conditions imposed by the FCC on wireless carriers to provide E-911 services are met as soon as possible so that the citizens of this state will have more reliable and efficient wireless emergency services.

The need for a funding mechanism. Wireline Enhanced 911 services in the state are funded by telephone subscribers. Wireless 911 services are not funded. Funding for wireless E-911 service will be necessary to ensure PSAPs have the necessary systems to be capable of receiving E-911 information from wireless carriers. Further, given the continued rise in the use of wireless communications, PSAPs will experience increasing demand and incur additional costs for ongoing operation and maintenance of the emergency 911 system. Wireless carriers will incur costs to upgrade systems to be capable of meeting the FCC mandate and will incur a continuous cost in providing E-911 information. The general assembly finds that the principal purpose of wireless E-911 funding is for wireless carriers to recover the costs of providing E-911 services and therefore to fulfill the FCC mandate.

Establishment and purpose of an E-911 emergency services fund. To ensure that adequate and sustained funding for E-911 statewide emergency services exists so that wireless and wireline E-911 systems can be implemented, maintained, and provided at optimum technical levels, and E-911 services performed at optimum skill levels, the legislature finds that it is necessary and proper to establish a “911 emergency services fund.” The 911 emergency services fund shall be the cost recovery mechanism for all E-911 service providers and shall serve as the means through which PSAP upgrades, including upgrades required to receive E-911 information from wireless carriers, may be implemented and maintained.

Indemnification. Given the complexity of providing E-911 services, the general assembly finds that it is appropriate to provide immunity from civil liability for landline and wireless E-911 service providers. Further, the general assembly finds that to encourage innovation in the provision of emergency services, it is in the public interest to also extend immunity by statute to any person that provides equipment or services for the establishment, maintenance, or operation of E-911 services. Immunity would not extend to willful or wanton acts of misconduct by the E-911 service provider or its employees and agents.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 152, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 123, § 1.

39-21.1-2.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “911 Emergency Telephone Number Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 152, § 1.

39-21.1-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Automatic location identification (ALI)” means the system capability to identify automatically the geographical location of the telephone being used by the caller and to provide a display of the location information at a public safety answering point.

“Automatic number identification (ANI)” means the system capability to identify automatically the calling telephone number and to provide a display of that number at a public safety answering point.

“Communications common carrier” means any person, party, or entity that provides communications services for profit by way of wire or radio. It includes re-sellers of such services.

“Communications services” means the transmission of sounds, messages, data, information, codes, or signals between a point or points of origin and a point or points of reception.

“Prepaid wireless E-911 telecommunications service” means a wireless telecommunications service that allows a caller to dial 911 to access the 911 system, which service must be paid for in advance and is sold in predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines with use in a known amount.

“Private safety agency” means a private entity that provides emergency fire, ambulance, or medical services.

“Public agency” means the state government and any unit of local government or special purpose district located in whole or in part within the state that provides, or has authority to provide, firefighting, law enforcement, ambulance, medical, or other emergency services.

“Public safety agency” means a functional division of a public agency that provides firefighting, law enforcement, ambulance, medical, or other emergency services.

“Public safety answering point (PSAP)” means a communications facility operated on a twenty-four (24) hour basis, assigned responsibility to transmit 911 calls to other public safety agencies. It is the first point of reception of a 911 call by a public safety agency and serves the entire state.

“Relay method” means the method of responding to a telephone request for emergency service whereby a public safety answering point notes pertinent information and relays it by telephone to the appropriate public safety agency or other provider of emergency services for dispatch of an emergency service unit.

“Selective call routing” means a feature that routes a 911 call from a central office to the designated public safety answering point based upon the telephone number of the calling party.

“Telecommunication services provider,” for purposes of this chapter and of chapter 21 of this title, means every person, party, or entity that provides communications services, telephony services, voice or data transmission services, and wireless prepaid services, including, but not limited to: audio, print information, voice over internet protocol (VoIP), data or visual information, communication or transmission or any combination thereof, for profit on a subscription, wireless prepaid service, wireless prepaid telephone calling arrangement or pay-for-services or any other basis by means of landline local telephone exchange, cellular telephone, wireless communication, radio, telephony, internet, data, satellite, computer, prepaid wireless telephone, voice over internet protocols (VoIP) instruments, devices or means, or any other communication or data instruments devices or means that have access to, connect with, or interface with the E-911 uniform emergency telephone system. Telecommunication service provider includes “telephone common carrier,” “communications common carrier,” “telephone companies,” and “common carrier” as those terms are used in this chapter and in chapter 21 of this title, and “telecommunication common carrier” as defined in the Code of Federal Regulations at 47 C.F.R. part 22, as amended from time to time, and as defined in the NENA Master Glossary of

9-1-1

Terminology as amended from time to time.

“Telephone common carrier” means any person, party, or entity that provides communications services for profit between a point of origin and a point of reception by way of a land-line wire connection between the two (2) points. It includes re-sellers of such services.

“Telephone service provider” means every person, party, or entity that provides telephone services to subscribers or wireless prepaid customers including, but not limited to, “telephone common carrier” and “telecommunications service providers.”

“Telephony” or “telephony services provider” (see “Telephone service provider”).

“The 911 authority” means the agency of the state government in which responsibility for administering the implementation and operation of the 911 system is vested by the general assembly.

“Transfer method” means the method of responding to a telephone request for emergency service whereby a public safety answering point transfers the call directly to the appropriate public safety agency or other provider of emergency service for dispatch of an emergency service unit.

“Voice over internet protocol (VoIP)” provides distinct packetized voice or data information in digital format using the Internet Protocol.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 152, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 236, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 365, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 9, § 11.

39-21.1-4.
Confidentiality.

Automatic number identification (ANI) and automatic location identification (ALI) information that consists of the name, address, and telephone numbers of telephone subscribers shall be confidential. Dissemination of the information contained in the 911 automatic number and automatic location database is prohibited except for the following purposes:

The information will be provided to the public safety answering point (PSAP) on a call-by-call basis only for the purpose of handling emergency calls or for training, and any permanent record of the information shall be secured by the public safety answering points and disposed of in a manner that will retain that security except as otherwise required by applicable law.

All telephone calls and telephone call transmissions received pursuant to this chapter, and all tapes containing records of telephone calls, shall remain confidential and used only for the purpose of handling emergency calls and for public safety purposes as may be needed for law enforcement, fire, medical, rescue, or other emergency services. The calls shall not be released to any other parties without the written consent of the person whose voice is recorded, or upon order of the court.

The ALI — ANI Database may be provided to all city, state, and town emergency management agencies, fire departments, and police departments of the state of Rhode Island for the purposes of, and restricted to, establishing systems of emergency public warning. “ALI — ANI Database” shall be defined as automatic location identification and automatic number identification information identifying the land-line telephone numbers and addresses (but shall not include the names, whether listed, unlisted, or unpublished) of subscribers to telephone common carrier services in the state.

Telephone numbers, including listed, unlisted, and unpublished numbers, and street numbers and addresses (excluding individual names), if contained within the Rhode Island E-911 ALI — ANI Database, may be provided by Rhode Island E-911, on a reasonable basis as determined by Rhode Island E-911 to city, state, and town emergency management agencies, fire departments, and police departments for the sole purpose of allowing an individual city, state, or town emergency management agency, fire department, and/or police department to warn local residents of imminent and significant threats to public safety.

The city or town local emergency warning system ALI — ANI Database shall be located in a restricted access and secured facility located within the local emergency management office, fire department, and/or police department. Additionally, the local emergency warning system ALI — ANI Database shall be secure from unauthorized access and shall be accessible only by the city or town emergency management director, fire chief, or police chief and no more than three (3) department members (who shall be known as emergency warning officers), appointed in writing by the respective department director or chief, with a copy of the appointment that includes the name, title, and duration of appointment sent to Rhode Island E-911. The activation of the local emergency warning system can only be approved and authorized by the department director or chief or his or her authorized emergency warning officer. Any access to the local ALI — ANI database shall be documented by use of a secure electronic log that records such access and which shall be maintained for a period of no less than twelve (12) months. Any unauthorized and/or inappropriate access of the local emergency warning system ALI — ANI Database is to be reported immediately in writing to Rhode Island E-911.

A violation of the provisions of this section shall be a criminal offense punishable by up to one year imprisonment and/or a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 152, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 236, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 184, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 228, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 13.

39-21.1-5.
Establishment of 911 service.

The state shall establish a single, central statewide emergency 911 system equipped with selective call routing, automatic number identification, and automatic location identification. All telecommunication service providers who operate within this state shall provide access to the E-911 uniform emergency telephone system with selective call routing, automatic number identification, and automatic location identification capabilities in accordance with this chapter, with the rules and regulations of the Federal Communications Commission and of the Rhode Island public utilities commission, and with such other rules and regulations promulgated by the 911 authority. Before the public utilities commission shall grant any license, permit, power, or authority to operate or shall approve any tariff, rate, or similar compensation measure to any telephone common carrier or telecommunication services provider pursuant to this title, it shall obtain a certificate of compliance from the 911 authority, certifying that the telephone common carrier or telecommunication services provider that is seeking such grant or approval is in compliance with the standards of quality of service, performance of service, and technological compliance adopted by the 911 authority pursuant to chapter 21 of this title. No license, permit, power, or authority to operate shall be granted, or any tariff, rate, or similar compensation measure be approved, until and unless the telephone common carrier or telecommunication service provider is in full compliance with such standards.

The digits “911” shall be the primary emergency telephone number within the state.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit or discourage the municipalities to maintain separate, secondary backup telephone numbers for emergency and nonemergency telephone calls. Dissemination of the information contained in the database for any other than emergency purpose is prohibited. The 911 emergency telephone number is not intended as a total replacement for the telephone service of the public safety agencies. The public safety answering point will not use the 911 system for administrative purposes, for placing outgoing calls, or for receiving nonemergency calls.

Any addition to the basic 911 system that may be required by any municipality may be made at the municipality’s expense, provided that the addition is approved by the 911 authority.

The 911 authority and the telephone common carrier contracting with the authority shall not be liable for any inadequate database information submitted to the 911 authority by the municipality, its agents, or servants.

Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 31 of title 9, the telephone common carrier, its agents, and employees are hereby indemnified and held harmless by the 911 authority and the state for civil damages for any action or omission in connection with the 911 or E-911 systems unless the action or omission constitutes gross negligence or wanton and willful misconduct.

Any expense incurred by a municipality shall not be deemed a state mandate pursuant to §

45-13-9

.

The telephone common carrier shall not issue or permit the usage of any three-digit (3) telephone number for emergency purposes other than the digits “911” as provided in this chapter.

The state of Rhode Island, the E-911 uniform emergency telephone system authority, local public service answering points, E-911 service providers, including telephone common carriers and telecommunication services providers and their respective employees, directors, officers, representatives, or agents shall not be liable to any person for civil damages resulting from or caused by any act or omission in the development, design, installation, operation, maintenance, performance, or provision of E-911 service, except to the extent due directly to its willful misconduct or gross negligence. Also, no provider of E-911 service, including a telecommunication services provider, shall be liable to any person who uses E-911 service, for the release of subscriber information, including but not limited to, billing information required under this act, to any public safety answering point or to the state of Rhode Island or the E-911 uniform emergency telephone system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 152, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 236, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 65, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 123, § 1.

39-21.1-6.
Other agencies — E-911 authority.

The 911 authority, or any other agency that may replace it, shall plan, implement, and operate the 911 system, as provided by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 152, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 236, § 1.

39-21.1-7.
Methods of handling emergency telephone calls.

The 911 system designs should include provisions for expansion to include capabilities not required in initial implementation. The public safety answering point may handle nonemergency calls by referring the caller to another number.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 152, § 1.

39-21.1-8.
Emergency services included in system.

The 911 system shall be capable of transmitting requests for law enforcement, firefighting, and emergency medical and ambulance services to a public safety agency or agencies that provide the requested service at the place where the call originates. In response to requests for emergency medical or ambulance services, the 911 system dispatchers shall also provide for the communication of instructions to callers during the period before the arrival of emergency responders. By September 1, 2022, the 911 system shall include telecommunicator cardiopulmonary resuscitation (“T-CPR”), provided by certified emergency medical dispatchers (EMD) who have satisfactorily completed a training course that meets the requirements of the U.S. Department of Transportation, National Highway Traffic Safety Administration, Emergency Medical Dispatch (EMD); National Standard Curriculum, as from time to time amended, and any other requirements pursuant to §

23-4.1-3(c)

. The 911 system may also provide for transmittal of requests for other emergency services, such as poison control, suicide prevention, and civil defense. Conferencing capability with counseling, aid to persons with disabilities, and other services as deemed necessary for emergency response determination may be provided by the 911 system.

Any unit of any agency or municipality in this state that provides law enforcement, firefighting, medical, or ambulance services to an area shall be part of the 911 system. The 911 public safety answering point may transmit emergency response requests to private safety agencies.

Automatic intrusion alarms and other automatic alerting devices shall not be installed so as to cause the number 911 to be dialed in order to directly access emergency services.

A comprehensive call review and quality improvement program including, but not limited to, all cardiac arrest and critical calls as well as a random sampling of all calls from the emergency telephone system shall be established.

All 911 system dispatchers shall be certified in EMD and trained in telecommunicator cardiopulmonary resuscitation (“T-CPR”) to coach a person calling in about a cardiac arrest incident until the rescue or other emergency service unit arrives. EMD continuing education shall be provided for 911 system dispatchers.

No 911 system operator who renders emergency assistance to a person in need thereof shall be liable for civil damages that result from acts or omissions by the person rendering the emergency care, which may constitute ordinary negligence. This immunity does not apply to acts or omissions constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton conduct.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 152, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 236, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 90; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 90; P.L. 2021, ch. 82, § 1, effective June 23, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 83, § 1, effective June 23, 2021.

39-21.1-9.
Pay telephones, dialing without a coin.

Every pay station telephone of a telephone common carrier served from a central office having a dial-tone-first capability shall permit a caller to dial 911, or to reach an operator by dialing “0,” without first inserting a coin or paying any other charge. No telephone common carrier shall eliminate the dial-tone-first capability from any central office having this capability on June 13, 1986.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 152, § 1.

39-21.1-10.
Development of a statewide plan and technical standards.

On or before July 1, 1987, the E-911 uniform emergency telephone system division shall publish an overall plan that it has developed for implementing 911 service in Rhode Island in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. The plan shall include technical and operational standards for 911 systems. Public agencies shall comply with these standards.

The E-911 uniform emergency telephone system division, or any other agency that may replace it, may promulgate rules and regulations related to telecommunication service providers as are just and reasonable and in the public interest to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 152, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 236, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 150, § 1.

39-21.1-11.
System coordination.

Each local public agency shall designate a coordinator who shall serve as the point of contact in working with the 911 authority or any other agency that may replace it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 152, § 1.

39-21.1-12.
Enforcement of compliance by judicial proceedings.

The attorney general shall, at the request of the E-911 uniform emergency telephone system division, or any other agency that may replace it, or on its own initiative, commence judicial proceedings in the superior court against any public agency, municipality, or telecommunication services provider providing communication services to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 152, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 150, § 1.

39-21.1-13.
Provision of emergency services across jurisdictional boundaries — Joint power or other agreements.

A public safety agency that receives a request for emergency service outside its jurisdictional or operational boundaries shall promptly forward the request, utilizing the transfer or relay method, to the public safety answering point or public safety agency responsible for that geographical area.

Once a public safety answering point or public safety agency dispatches an emergency unit, the unit shall render its services to the requesting party without regard to the unit’s normal jurisdictional boundaries, until it is properly relieved by the public safety agency responsible for that geographical area.

Public agencies within a single system, and public agencies in different systems but which share common boundary lines, are authorized to enter into joint power agreements or other written cooperative agreements to implement these requirements. These agreements may further provide for a public safety agency to render aid outside its normal jurisdictional boundaries on a regular basis.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 152, § 1.

39-21.1-14.
E-911 surcharge and first response surcharge.

A monthly E-911 surcharge of fifty cents ($.50) is hereby levied upon each residence and business telephone line or trunk, or path and data, telephony, internet, voice over internet protocol (VoIP) wireline, line, trunk, or path in the state including PBX trunks and centrex equivalent trunks and each line or trunk serving, and upon each user interface number or extension number or similarly identifiable line, trunk, or path to or from a digital network (such as, but not exclusive of, integrated services digital network (ISDN), Flexpath, or comparable digital private branch exchange, or connecting to or from a customer-based or dedicated telephone switch site (such as, but not exclusive of, a private branch exchange (PBX)), or connecting to or from a customer-based or dedicated central office (such as, but not exclusive of, a centrex system but exclusive of trunks and lines provided to wireless communication companies) that can access to, connect with, or interface with the Rhode Island E-911 uniform emergency telephone system (RI E-911). In each instance where a surcharge is levied pursuant to this subsection (a)(1) there shall also be a monthly first response surcharge of fifty cents ($.50). The surcharges shall be billed by each telecommunication services provider at the inception of services and shall be payable to the telecommunication services provider by the subscriber of the services.

A monthly E-911 surcharge of fifty cents ($.50) is hereby levied on each wireless instrument, device, or means, including prepaid, cellular, telephony, internet, voice over internet protocol (VoIP), satellite, computer, radio, communication, data or data only wireless lines, or any other wireless instrument, device, or means that has access to, connects with, or activates or interfaces or any combination thereof with the E-911 uniform emergency telephone system. In each instance where a surcharge is levied pursuant to this subsection (a)(2) there shall also be a monthly first response surcharge of seventy-five cents ($.75). The surcharges shall be billed by each telecommunication services provider and shall be payable to the telecommunication services provider by the subscriber. Prepaid wireless telecommunications services shall not be included in this act, but shall be governed by chapter 21.2 of this title. The E-911 uniform emergency telephone system shall establish, by rule or regulation, an appropriate funding mechanism to recover from the general body of ratepayers this surcharge.

The amount of the surcharges shall not be subject to the tax imposed under chapter 18 of title 44 nor be included within the telephone common carrier’s gross earnings for the purpose of computing the tax under chapter 13 of title 44.

Each telephone common carrier and each telecommunication services provider shall establish a special account to which it shall deposit on a monthly basis the amounts collected as surcharges under this section.

The money collected by each telecommunication services provider shall be transferred within sixty (60) days after its inception of wireline, wireless, prepaid, cellular, telephony, voice over internet protocol (VoIP), satellite, computer, internet, or communications services in this state and every month thereafter, to the division of taxation, together with the accrued interest. The E-911 surcharge shall be deposited in a restricted-receipt account and used solely for the operation of the E-911 uniform emergency telephone system. The first response surcharge shall be deposited in the general fund; provided, however, that ten percent (10%) of the money collected from the first response surcharge shall be deposited in the information technology investment fund established pursuant to §

42-11-2.5

. Any money not transferred in accordance with this subsection shall be assessed interest at the rate set forth in §

44-1-7

from the date the money should have been transferred.

Every billed subscriber-user shall be liable for any surcharge imposed under this section until it has been paid to the telephone common carrier or telecommunication services provider. Any surcharge shall be added to and shall be stated separately in the billing by the telephone common carrier or telecommunication services provider and shall be collected by the telephone common carrier or telecommunication services provider.

Each telephone common carrier and telecommunication services provider shall annually provide the E-911 uniform emergency telephone system division, or any other agency that may replace it, with a list of amounts uncollected, together with the names and addresses of its subscriber-users who can be determined by the telephone common carrier or telecommunication services provider to have not paid the E-911 surcharge.

Included within, but not limited to, the purposes for which the money collected from the E-911 surcharge may be used, are rent, lease, purchase, improvement, construction, maintenance, repair, and utilities for the equipment and site or sites occupied by the E-911 uniform emergency telephone system; salaries, benefits, and other associated personnel costs; acquisition, upgrade, or modification of PSAP equipment to be capable of receiving E-911 information, including necessary computer hardware, software, and database provisioning, addressing, and non-recurring costs of establishing emergency services; network development, operation, and maintenance; database development, operation, and maintenance; on-premise equipment maintenance and operation; training emergency service personnel regarding use of E-911; educating consumers regarding the operations, limitations, role, and responsible use of E-911; reimbursement to telephone common carriers or telecommunication services providers of rates or recurring costs associated with any services, operation, administration, or maintenance of E-911 services as approved by the division; reimbursement to telecommunication services providers or telephone common carriers of other costs associated with providing E-911 services, including the cost of the design, development, and implementation of equipment or software necessary to provide E-911 service information to PSAPs, as approved by the division.

[Deleted by P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 28, § 1.]

Nothing in this section shall be construed to constitute rate regulation of wireless communication services carriers, nor shall this section be construed to prohibit wireless communication services carriers from charging subscribers for any wireless service or feature.

[Deleted by P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 4, § 1.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 152, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 236, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 65, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 73, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 55, art. 28, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 160, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 15; P.L. 2005, ch. 365, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 246, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 4, § 2; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 9, § 11; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 9, § 5; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 7, § 9; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 2, § 8.

39-21.1-15.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 152, § 1.

39-21.1-16.
Providing false information.

No person shall call or otherwise cause the number nine-one-one (911) to be called for the purpose of knowingly making a false alarm or complaint or reporting false information that could result in the dispatch of emergency services from any public agency as defined in §

39-21.1-3(7)

. Any person violating the provisions of this section, upon conviction, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment for a term not exceeding one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 90, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 13.

39-21.1-17.
Confidentiality of calls.

All telephone calls and telephone call transmissions received pursuant to this chapter and all tapes containing records of telephone calls shall remain confidential and used only for the purpose of handling emergency calls and for public safety purposes as may be needed for law enforcement, fire, medical, rescue or other emergency services. The calls shall not be released to any other parties without the written consent of the caller whose voice is recorded, or upon order of the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 180, § 1.

39-21.1-18.
First responder services.

In emergency situations that require emergency medical transportation services and arise out of a 911 emergency telephone system request, only those ambulance services that are operated by municipalities, for municipalities by contracted services, by fire districts, or nonprofit corporations shall be used.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 337, § 1.